Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1774.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168E.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Transactions. The following retail deliveries are exempt from the fee imposed by this chapter: (1) a retail delivery to a purchaser who is exempt from tax under chapter 297A; (2) a retail delivery on a motor vehicle for which a permit issued by the commissioner of transportation or a road authority is required under chapter 169 or 221 and the retailer has maintained books and records through reasonable and verifiable standards that the retail delivery was on a qualifying vehicle; (3) a retail delivery resulting from a retail sale of food and food ingredients or prepared food; (4) a retail delivery resulting from a retail sale by a food and beverage service establishment, regardless of whether the retail delivery is made by a third party other than the food and beverage service establishment; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) a retail delivery resulting from a retail sale of drugs and medical devices, accessories and supplies, or baby productsnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) a retail delivery resulting from the delivery of aggregate materials subject to sales tax under section 297A.61, subdivision 3, paragraph (g), clause (5)new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end